Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

General Provisions

4-14-101, 4-14-102. [Reserved.]

The industrial development division of the department of economic and community development may appoint and fix the compensation of such employees as it may deem necessary for its work. The division may also contract with industrial engineers and other consultants for such services as it may require.

The division shall be supplied with the necessary office space, accommodations and necessary equipment.

Upon request of the division, the governor may, from time to time, for the purpose of special surveys under the direction of the division, assign or detail to the division any member of any state administrative department or bureau or agency, or may direct any such department, bureau or agency to make for the division special surveys or studies requested by the division.

Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 2 (Williams, § 1016.10); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1402.

Cross-References. Industrial development, powers and duties of department of economic and community development, §4-3-706.

4-14-104. Industrial development division — Travel expenses.

In the event the director of the industrial development division, or the director's authorized representative, travels within or without the state for the purpose of promoting industrial development, the director shall certify the director's expense voucher, or the voucher of the director's authorized representative, as all other expense vouchers are certified for payment, but the same shall receive immediate and preferred attention by the commissioner of finance and administration, in view of the expected travel expense of the director or the director's representative.

Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 2 (Williams, § 1016.10); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1403.

4-14-105. Department of economic and community development — Duties.

It is the duty and function of the department of economic and community development to:

Promote in a sound manner the location of additional industries and businesses in the state, to utilize the state's resources to the best advantage and to increase employment opportunities for all elements of the state's population;

Aid and encourage the existing industries of the state; and

Cooperate with existing state and federal agencies and local governments and agricultural, business, industrial and educational interests of the state in promotion of industrial development in this state.

Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 3 (Williams, § 1016.11); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1404; Acts 1985, ch. 256, § 4.

4-14-106. Department of economic and community development — Powers.

To achieve the aims stated in §4-14-105, the department of economic and community development is authorized to:

Undertake studies and research of the state's industrial resources, industrial opportunities, potentialities and problems affecting industrial growth;

Disseminate information in the interest of industrial development by publication, advertisement and other means;

Provide advice and technical assistance to existing, prospective and potential industries, to local governments, chambers of commerce and other agencies, groups and individuals in the promotion of the general aims of this chapter; and

Cooperate with the University of Tennessee and other institutions of higher learning, technological and trade schools and the public schools of the state in the interest of industrial experimentation and education.

Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 3 (Williams, § 1016.11); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1405; Acts 1985, ch. 256, § 5.

4-14-107. Industrial development division — Appropriation.

There is hereby appropriated for expenditure by the industrial development division from funds in the state treasury not otherwise appropriated the sum of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) per annum.

Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 4 (Williams, § 1016.12); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1406; Acts 1980, ch. 887, § 3; 1985, ch. 256, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

4-14-108. [Obsolete.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former §4-14-108 (Acts 1953, ch. 219, § 5 (Williams, § 1016.13); impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; modified; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 4-1407), concerning industrial development division and the publications of planning commission, was deemed obsolete and was deleted by the code commission in 2005.

4-14-109. Industrial development division — Building finance committee.

There is created in the industrial development division, referred to in this section as the “division,” a building finance committee referred to in this section as the “committee,” which shall exercise the powers and duties and discharge the responsibilities enumerated in this section and in title 7, chapters 53 and 55 for such committee, subject to such review and rules and regulations as may be prescribed by the division.

The committee shall consist of the vice chair of the former Tennessee board of economic growth, serving ex officio as chair of the committee, and six (6) additional members appointed by the governor, two (2) from each of the three (3) grand geographical divisions of the state, who shall be competent to serve on the committee by reason of experience in the fields of investment finance or industry.

The term of each appointive member shall be four (4) years.

Any vacancy in the appointive membership shall be filled by the governor for the unexpired term.

The members of the committee shall serve without pay, except for actual expenses incurred in the course of attending to the official business of the committee.

The director of the division shall serve as secretary of the committee, and such additional staff may be assigned or employed as may be deemed necessary by the committee, to carry out effectively title 7, chapters 53 and 55.

A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any and all business of the committee, and one (1) member shall be designated as a vice chair to preside at meetings and otherwise act as chair in the absence of the chair.

All orders, findings, acts and certificates of the committee shall be attested by the signature of the chair or vice chair, and the secretary, and when so attested, all orders, acts, findings and certificates of the committee shall be competent evidence and shall be given full faith and credit in any court or proceeding, and unless affirmatively shown to the contrary, it shall be presumed that the proceedings of the committee were in all things regular.

The secretary, or in the secretary's absence, some person designated by the secretary to act in the secretary's place, shall keep regular and accurate minutes of the committee's proceedings, in a minute book provided for that purpose, which shall be a public record, and all orders, findings and acts of the committee shall be entered upon its minutes.

The committee is authorized and empowered to use and expend such funds as may be made available for its purposes by the staff division.

The committee shall hold regular meetings at the offices of the division, and at such other times and places as its duties may require, with the express authority to adjourn or recess from time to time, and place to place, and to convene special meetings by unanimous consent.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The committee shall adopt and implement a conflict of interest policy for committee members. The policy shall mandate annual written disclosures of financial interests, other possible conflicts of interest, and an acknowledgement by committee members that they have read and understand all aspects of the policy. The policy shall also require persons who are to be appointed to the committee to acknowledge, as a condition of appointment, that they are not in conflict with the conditions of the policy.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 13; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 169, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, §§ 12, 13; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1 (44); T.C.A., §§ 4-1401, 4-1408; Acts 2013, ch. 252, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. The industrial development division, building finance committee, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

The Tennessee board of economic growth, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 105, § 3, effective April 27, 2009.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.